Vermont, session 2025-2026, H77.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5822 is amended to read:
§ 5822. TAX ON INCOME OF INDIVIDUALS, ESTATES, AND TRUSTS
(a) A tax is imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income earned
or received in that year by every individual, estate, and trust, subject to income
taxation under the laws of the United States, in an amount determined by the
following tables, and adjusted as required under this section:
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 2 of 8
(1) Married individuals filing joint returns and surviving spouses:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $64,600.00 $79,950.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $64,600.00 $79,950.00 but $2,164.00 $2,678.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $156,150.00 $193,300.00 amount of taxable income over
$64,600.00 $79,950.00
Over $156,150.00 $193,300.00 but $8,206.00 $10,159.00 plus 7.6% of
not over $237,950.00 $294,600.00 the amount of taxable income over
$156,150.00 $193,300.00
Over $237,950.00 $294,600.00 but $14,423.00 $17,858.00
not over $1,217,350.00 plus 8.75% of the amount of taxable
income over $237,950.00
$294,600.00
Over $1,217,350.00 $98,599.00 plus 12.75% of the
amount over $1,217,350.00
(2) Heads of households:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $51,850.00 $64,200.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $51,850.00 $64,200.00 but $1,737.00 $2,151.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $133,850.00 $165,700.00 amount of taxable income over
$51,850.00 $64,200.00
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 3 of 8
Over $133,850.00 $165,700.00 but $7,149.00 $8,850.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $216,700.00 $268,350.00 amount of taxable income over
$133,850.00 $165,700.00
Over $216,700.00 $268,300.00 $13,446.00 $16,647.00 plus 8.75% of
but not over $1,108,675.00 the amount of taxable income over
$216,700.00 $268,300.00
Over $1,108,675.00 $90,180.00 plus 12.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$1,108,675.00
(3) Unmarried individuals (other than surviving spouse or head of
household):
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $38,700.00 $47,900.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $38,700.00 $47,900.00 but $1,296.00 $1,605.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $93,700.00 $116,000.00 6.6% of the amount of taxable
income over $38,700.00 $47,900.00
Over $93,700.00 $116,000.00 but $4,926.00 $6,099.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $195,450.00 $242,000.00 amount of taxable income over
$93,700.00 $116,000.00
Over $195,450.00 $242,000.00 but $12,659.00 $15,675.00 plus 8.75% of
not over $1,000,000.00 the amount of taxable income over
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 4 of 8
$195,450.00 $242,000.00
Over $1,000,000.00 $82,000.00 plus 12.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$1,000,000.00
(4) Married individuals filing separate returns:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $32,300.00 $39,975.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $32,300.00 $39,975.00 but $1,082.00 $1,339.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $78,075.00 $96,650.00 amount of taxable income over
$32,300.00 $39,975.00
Over $78,075.00 $96,650.00 but $4,103.00 $5,080.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $118,975.00 $147,300.00 amount of taxable income over
$78,075.00 $96,650.00
Over $118,975.00 $147,300.00 but $7,212.00 $8,929.00 plus 8.75% of
not over $608,675.00 the amount of taxable income over
$118,975.00 $147,300.00
Over $608,675.00 $49,299.00 plus 12.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$608,675.00
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 5 of 8
(5) Estates and trusts:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
$2,600.00 $3,200.00 or less 3.35% of taxable income
Over $2,600.00 $3,200.00 but $87.00 $107.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $6,100.00 $7,500.00 amount of taxable income over
$2,600.00 $3,200.00
Over $6,100.00 $7,500.00 but $318.00 $391.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $9,350.00 $11,550.00 amount of taxable income over
$6,100.00 $7,500.00
Over $9,350.00 $11,550.00 $565.00 $699.00 plus 8.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$9,350.00 $11,550.00
(6) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer exceeds
$150,000.00, then the tax calculated under this subsection shall be the greater
of the tax calculated under subdivisions (1)–(5) of this subsection or three
percent of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Married individuals,” “surviving spouse,” “head of household,”
“unmarried individual,” “estate,” and “trust” have the same meaning as under
the Internal Revenue Code.
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 6 of 8
(2) The amounts of taxable income shown in the tables in this section
shall be adjusted annually for inflation by the Commissioner of Taxes using
the Consumer Price Index adjustment percentage, in the manner prescribed for
inflation adjustment of federal income tax tables for the taxable year by the
Commissioner of Internal Revenue, beginning with taxable year 2003 2025;
provided, however, notwithstanding 26 U.S.C. § 1(f)(3), that as used in this
subdivision, “consumer price index” means the last Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers published by the U.S. Department of Labor.
* * *
(f) The revenue generated by individual income taxes levied pursuant to
this chapter shall be deposited in the General Fund, except as follows:
(1) An amount equal to two percent of the taxable income taxed at the
highest marginal tax rate under subdivisions (1)–(4) of this section shall be
deposited in the Education Fund established under 16 V.S.A. § 4025.
(2) An amount equal to one percent of the taxable income taxed at the
highest marginal tax rate under subdivisions (1)–(4) of this section shall be
deposited in the Transportation Fund established under 19 V.S.A. § 11 for use
in the repair and maintenance of roads and bridges and for public
transportation.
(3) An amount equal to one percent of the taxable income taxed at the
highest marginal tax rate under subdivisions (1)–(4) of this section shall be
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 7 of 8
deposited in the Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund
established under 16 V.S.A. § 2885.
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 435 is amended to read:
§ 435. GENERAL FUND
(a) There is established the General Fund, which shall be the basic
operating fund of the State. The General Fund shall be used to finance all
expenditures for which no special revenues have otherwise been provided by
law.
(b) The General Fund shall be composed of revenues from the following
sources:
* * *
(5) individual income taxes levied pursuant to chapter 151 of this title,
except as otherwise deposited pursuant to subsection 5822(f) of this title;
* * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
* * *
(10) wind-powered electric generating facilities tax deposited pursuant
to 32 V.S.A. § 5402c; and
VT LEG #379088 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.77
2025 Page 8 of 8
(11) revenues from the short-term rental surcharge under 32 V.S.A.
§ 9301; and
(12) income tax revenue deposited pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5822(f).
* * *
Sec. 5. 19 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. TRANSPORTATION FUND
The Transportation Fund shall comprise the following:
* * *
(8) other miscellaneous sources including the sale of maps, plans, and
reports, fees collected by the Travel Information Council, leases for property at
State-owned airports and railroads, proceeds from the sale of State surplus
property under the provisions of 29 V.S.A. §§ 1556 and 1557, and proceeds
from the sale of recycled materials; and
(9) income tax revenue deposited pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5822(f).
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2025 and apply to taxable years on and after January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379088 v.1